Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Charitable Gift Annuities

§79-11-651.
Definitions.

“Charitable gift annuity” means a transfer of cash or other property by a donor to a charitable organization in return for an annuity payable over one (1) or two (2) lives, under which the actuarial value of the annuity is less than the value of the cash or other property transferred and the difference in value constitutes a charitable deduction for federal tax purposes.

“Charitable organization” means an entity described by:

Section 501(c)(3), Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3)); or

Section 170(c), Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Section 170(c)).

“Qualified charitable gift annuity” means a charitable gift annuity described in Section 501(m)(5), Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Section 501(m)(5)), and Section 514(c)(5), Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Section 514(c)(5)), that is issued by a charitable organization that on the date of the annuity agreement:

Has a minimum of Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) in unrestricted cash, cash equivalents, or publicly traded securities, exclusive of the assets funding the annuity agreement; and

Has been in continuous operation for at least three (3) years or is a successor or affiliate of a charitable organization that has been in continuous operation for at least three (3) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 332, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§79-11-653.
Charitable gift annuity is not insurance.

The issuance of a qualified charitable gift annuity does not constitute engaging in the business of insurance in this state.

A charitable gift annuity issued before July 1, 2001, is a qualified charitable gift annuity for purposes of Sections 79-11-651 through 79-11-661, and the issuance of that charitable gift annuity does not constitute engaging in the business of insurance in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 332, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

Business of insurance, generally, see §§ 83-5-1 et seq.

Regulation of trade practices in the business of insurance, see §§ 83-5-29 through 83-5-51.

§79-11-655.
Notice to donor.

When entering into an agreement for a qualified charitable gift annuity, the charitable organization shall disclose to the donor in writing in the annuity agreement that a qualified charitable gift annuity is not insurance under the laws of this state and is not subject to regulation by the insurance commissioner or protected by an insurance guaranty association.

The notice provisions required by this section must be in a separate paragraph in a print size no smaller than that employed in the annuity agreement generally.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 332, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

Effect of failure to comply with notice requirements imposed under this section, see § 79-11-659.

Procedure for enforcement of performance of requirements of this section by Secretary of State, see § 79-11-659.

§79-11-657.
Notice to department.

A charitable organization that issues qualified charitable gift annuities shall notify the Secretary of State in writing by the later of ninety (90) days after July 1, 2001, or the date on which it enters into the organization’s first qualified charitable gift annuity agreement. The notice shall:

Be signed by an officer or director of the organization;

Identify the organization; and

Certify that:

The organization is a charitable organization; and

The annuities issued by the organization are qualified charitable gift annuities.

The organization shall not be required to submit additional information except to determine appropriate penalties that may be applicable under Section 79-11-659.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 332, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

Effect of failure to comply with notice requirements imposed under this section, see § 79-11-659.

Procedure for enforcement of performance of requirements of this section by Secretary of State, see § 79-11-659.

§79-11-659.
Effect of failure to provide required notice.

The failure of a charitable organization to comply with the notice requirements imposed under Section 79-11-655 or 79-11-657 does not prevent a charitable gift annuity that otherwise meets the requirements of 79-11-651 through 79-11-661 from constituting a qualified charitable gift annuity. The Secretary of State may enforce performance of the requirements of Sections 79-11-655 and 79-11-657 by sending a letter by certified mail, return receipt requested, demanding that the charitable organization comply with the requirements of Sections 79-11-655 and 79-11-657. The Secretary of State may fine the charitable organization in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per qualified charitable gift annuity agreement issued until such time as the charitable organization complies with Sections 79-11-655 and 79-11-657.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 332, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

Pursuant to
Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected an error in a statutory reference. The reference to “this act” in the first sentence was changed to “79-11-651 through 79-11-661”. The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its June 3, 2003 meeting, and the section has been reprinted in the supplement to reflect the corrected language.

§79-11-661.
Not unfair or deceptive trade practice.

The issuance of a qualified charitable gift annuity does not constitute a violation of Sections 83-5-29 through 83-5-51 which regulate trade practices in the business of insurance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 332, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

Regulation of trade practices in the business of insurance, see §§ 83-5-29 through 83-5-51.